District of Columbia statutes.
31-3002

Payable benefits.

A health benefit plan shall provide coverage for the equipment, supplies, and other outpatient self-management training and education, including medical nutritional therapy, for the treatment of insulin-dependent diabetes, insulin-using diabetes, gestational diabetes, and non-insulin using diabetes if prescribed by a health care professional legally authorized to prescribe such item.

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-175, § 3, 47 DCR 6832